New York, session 2025-2026, A9545.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph a of subdivision 4 of section 2 3602 of the education law, as amended by section 10-a of part A of chap- 3 ter 56 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (2) (A) The regional cost index shall reflect an analysis of labor 5 market costs based on median salaries in professional occupations that 6 require similar credentials to those of positions in the education 7 field, but not including those occupations in the education field, 8 provided that the regional cost indices for the two thousand seven--two 9 thousand eight school year [and thereafter] through the two thousand 10 twenty-five--two thousand twenty-six school year shall be as follows: 11 Labor Force Region Index 12 Capital District 1.124 13 Southern Tier 1.045 14 Western New York 1.091 15 Hudson Valley 1.314 16 Long Island/NYC 1.425 17 Finger Lakes 1.141 18 Central New York 1.103 19 Mohawk Valley 1.000 20 North Country 1.000 21 Provided that in the two thousand twenty-five--two thousand twenty-six 22 school year and thereafter, the regional cost index for Westchester 23 county shall be 1.351. 24 (B) For the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty-seven school 25 year and thereafter the regional cost indices shall be as follows: 26 Labor Force Region Index 27 Capital District 1.124 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03427-02-5 A. 9545 2 1 Southern Tier 1.045 2 Western New York 1.091 3 Hudson Valley 1.425 4 Long Island/NYC 1.425 5 Finger Lakes 1.141 6 Central New York 1.103 7 Mohawk Valley 1.000 8 North Country 1.000 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.